North Carolina, session 2025, HB109.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-32.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-32.4. Assault inflicting serious bodily injury; strangulation; penalties.
(a) Offense Involving Serious Bodily Injury. – Unless the conduct is covered under some
other provision of law providing greater punishment, any person who assaults another person and
inflicts serious bodily injury is guilty of a Class F E felony. "Serious bodily injury" is defined as
bodily injury that creates a substantial risk of death, or that causes serious permanent
disfigurement, coma, a permanent or protracted condition that causes extreme pain, or permanent
or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ, or that results in
prolonged hospitalization.
(b) Offense Involving Physical Injury. – Unless the conduct is covered under some other
provision of law providing greater punishment, any person who assaults another person and
inflicts physical injury by strangulation is guilty of a Class H G felony.
(c) Offense Generally. – Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of
law providing greater punishment, any person who assaults another person by strangulation is
guilty of a Class H felony.
(d) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Serious bodily injury. – Bodily injury that creates a substantial risk of death,
or that causes serious permanent disfigurement, coma, a permanent or
protracted condition that causes extreme pain, or permanent or protracted loss
or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ, or that results
in prolonged hospitalization.
(2) Strangulation. – Impeding the normal breathing or circulation of blood of
another person by applying pressure to the throat or neck of the person or by
obstructing the nose and mouth of the person."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective June 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H109-v-1*